Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,154
State-certified seeds; violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to issue, make, use, or circulate any certification as defined in section 81-2,149 without the authority and approval of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or its duly authorized agency. Every person, firm, association, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of sections 81-2,149 to 81-2,154 pertaining to certification shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1931, c. 151, § 6, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1821;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,154;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 281;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 58.